Georgia statutes. TITLE 5 Appeal And Error
Article 2 Grounds

Cross references.

Requirement that motions for new trial in civil cases be predicated upon intrinsic defect not appearing on face of record or pleadings, §

9-11-60

.

Those errors in admission or exclusion of evidence which will not constitute grounds for granting new trial, §

9-11-61

.

Law reviews.

For articles discussing the preparation of an amended motion for new trial and facts concerning appellate practice in general, prior to the adoption of the Appellate Practice Act, see 21 Ga. B.J. 424 (1959).

5-5-20.
Verdict contrary to evidence and justice.

In any case when the verdict of a jury is found contrary to evidence and the principles of justice and equity, the judge presiding may grant a new trial before another jury.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 503; Code 1863, § 3637; Code 1868, § 3662; Code 1873, § 3713; Code 1882, § 3713; Civil Code 1895, § 5477; Penal Code 1895, § 1057; Civil Code 1910, § 6082; Penal Code 1910, § 1084; Code 1933, § 70-202.

Law reviews.

For survey of cases dealing with criminal law and criminal procedure from June 1, 1977 through May 1978, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 27 (1978).

5-5-21.
Verdict against weight of evidence.

The presiding judge may exercise a sound discretion in granting or refusing new trials in cases where the verdict may be decidedly and strongly against the weight of the evidence even though there may appear to be some slight evidence in favor of the finding.

History.

Ga. L. 1853-54, p. 46, § 3; Code 1863, § 3641; Code 1868, § 3666; Code 1873, § 3717; Code 1882, § 3717; Civil Code 1895, § 5482; Penal Code 1895, § 1058; Civil Code 1910, § 6087; Penal Code 1910, § 1085; Code 1933, § 70-206.

Law reviews.

For survey of cases dealing with criminal law and criminal procedure from June 1, 1977 through May 1978, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 27 (1978).

5-5-22.
Illegal admission or exclusion of evidence.

The courts may grant new trials in all cases when any material evidence may be illegally admitted to or illegally withheld from the jury over the objection of the movant.

History.

Ga. L. 1853-54, p. 46, § 1; Code 1863, § 3638; Code 1868, § 3663; Code 1873, § 3714; Code 1882, § 3714; Civil Code 1895, § 5478; Penal Code 1895, § 1059; Civil Code 1910, § 6083; Penal Code 1910, § 1086; Code 1933, § 70-203.

Cross references.

Evidence generally, T. 24.

Law reviews.

For article, “A Discussion of the 1957 Amendments to Rules of Practice and Procedure in Georgia,” see 19 Ga. B.J. 395 (1957).

5-5-23.
Newly discovered evidence.

A new trial may be granted in any case where any material evidence, not merely cumulative or impeaching in its character but relating to new and material facts, is discovered by the applicant after the rendition of a verdict against him and is brought to the notice of the court within the time allowed by law for entertaining a motion for a new trial.

History.

Ga. L. 1853-54, p. 46, § 1; Code 1863, § 3640; Code 1868, § 3665; Code 1873, § 3716; Code 1882, § 3716; Civil Code 1895, §§ 5480, 5481; Penal Code 1895, § 1061; Civil Code 1910, §§ 6085, 6086; Penal Code 1910, § 1088; Code 1933, § 70-204.

Cross references.

Extraordinary motions for new trial, §

5-5-41

.

5-5-24.
Error in instructions; objection required in civil cases; requested instructions; review of charges involving substantial error.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, in all civil cases, no party may complain of the giving or the failure to give an instruction to the jury unless he objects thereto before the jury returns its verdict, stating distinctly the matter to which he objects and the grounds of his objection. Opportunity shall be given to make the objection out of the hearing of the jury. Objection need not be made with the particularity formerly required of assignments of error and need only be as reasonably definite as the circumstances will permit. This subsection shall not apply in criminal cases.

In all cases, at the close of the evidence or at such earlier time during the trial as the court reasonably directs, any party may present to the court written requests that it instruct the jury on the law as set forth therein. Copies of requests shall be given to opposing counsel for their consideration prior to the charge of the court. The court shall inform counsel of its proposed action upon the requests prior to their arguments to the jury but shall instruct the jury after the arguments are completed. The trial judge shall file with the clerk all requests submitted to him, whether given in charge or not.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section, the appellate courts shall consider and review erroneous charges where there has been a substantial error in the charge which was harmful as a matter of law, regardless of whether objection was made hereunder or not.

History.

Ga. L. 1853-54, p. 46, § 1; Code 1863, § 3639; Code 1868, § 3664; Code 1873, § 3715; Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 150, § 1; Code 1882, § 3715; Civil Code 1895, § 5479; Penal Code 1895, § 1060; Civil Code 1910, § 6084; Penal Code 1910, § 1087; Code 1933, § 70-207; Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 17; Ga. L. 1966, p. 493, § 6; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1072, § 9.

Cross references.

Granting of new trials in instances where judge expresses opinion as to what has or has not been proved or, in criminal actions, expresses the judge’s opinion as to guilt of accused, §§

9-10-7

and

17-8-55

.

Law reviews.

For article arguing for and against adoption of Rule 51 of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, so as to require objections to charges before verdict, see 1 Ga. St. B.J. 177 (1964).

For article, “The Appellate Procedure Act of 1965,” see 1 Ga. St. B.J. 451 (1965).

For article, “1966 Amendments to the Appellate Procedure Act of 1965,” see 2 Ga. St. B.J. 433 (1966).

For article comparing sections of Ch. 11, T. 5 with preexisting provisions of the Georgia Code, see 3 Ga. St. B.J. 295 (1967).

For article, “Synopses of 1968 Amendments Appellate Procedure Act and Georgia Civil Practice Act,” see 4 Ga. St. B. J. 503 (1968).

For article, “Trial Practice and Procedure,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 475 (2001).

For annual survey of trial practice and procedure, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 405 (2006).

For survey article on appellate practice and procedure, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 21 (2007).

For survey article on trial practice and procedure, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 423 (2007).

For comment on Bibb Transit Co. v. Johnson,

107 Ga. App. 804

,

131 S.E.2d 631

(1963), see 16 Mercer L. Rev. 347 (1964).

5-5-25.
Other grounds.

In all motions for a new trial on other grounds not provided for in this Code, the presiding judge must exercise a sound legal discretion in granting or refusing the same according to the provisions of the common law and practice of the courts.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3642; Code 1868, § 3667; Code 1873, § 3718; Code 1882, § 3718; Civil Code 1895, § 5483; Penal Code 1895, § 1062; Civil Code 1910, § 6088; Penal Code 1910, § 1089; Code 1933, § 70-208; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 5/HB 79.

The 2013 amendment,

effective April 24, 2013, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in this Code section.